Louisiana, session 2026, SB219.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:251(C)(1), 254(B)(1)(a)(i), 257(A), and 258(A) and (B) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 36:253.1, 258(N), and 258.1 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§251. Louisiana Department of Health; creation; domicile; composition; purpose
and functions
* * *
C.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall be composed of the
executive office of the secretary, the office of the surgeon general, the office of
management and finance, the office of public health, the office of behavioral health,
the office for citizens with developmental disabilities, the office of aging and adult
services, the office on women's health and community health, the office of health
and nutrition, and such other offices as shall be created by law.
* * *
§253.1. Executive office of the secretary; certain offices
A. The provisions of this Section shall apply to the following offices
within the Louisiana Department of Health:
(1) The executive office of the secretary.
(2) The office of health and nutrition.
B. The offices shall be under the direct supervision, direction, and
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 219 ENROLLED
control of the secretary.
C. The duties and functions of these offices shall be determined by the
secretary and shall be exercised under the direct supervision and control of the
secretary.
§254. Powers and duties of the secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health
* * *
B. The secretary shall have authority to:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in R.S. 36:801 and 803:
(i) Employ, appoint, remove, assign, and promote such personnel as is
necessary for the efficient administration of the executive office of the secretary and
the office of health and nutrition and the performance of its the offices' powers,
duties, functions, and responsibilities and such other personnel, who are not assigned
to an office, as may be necessary for the efficient administration of the department
and for the performance of the responsibilities, powers, duties, and functions of
agencies transferred to it.
* * *
§257. Assistant secretaries
A. Each office within the Louisiana Department of Health, except the
executive office of the secretary, the office of management and finance, the office
of health and nutrition, and the office of the surgeon general, shall be under the
immediate supervision and direction of an assistant secretary, who shall be appointed
by the governor with consent of the Senate. Each shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor and shall be paid a salary which shall be fixed by the governor, which
salary shall not exceed the amount approved for such position by the legislature
while in session.
* * *
§258. Offices; purposes and functions
A. The purposes for which the offices of the Louisiana Department of Health,
other than the executive office of the secretary and the office of management
and finance, are created shall be set forth in this Section.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 219 ENROLLED
B. The office of public health shall perform the functions of the state which
relate to the general health of the people of the state, including but not limited to
responsibility for the preparation and supervision of the Sanitary Code, local health
units, sewage treatment and disposal within the state, physical fitness, supplemental
food programs for women, infants, and children, emergency medical services, and
related functions affecting the public health. It shall also perform those functions of
the state provided by law relating to environmental quality and pollution control
which are related to the public health and which are specifically assigned to the
department, including but not limited to functions relating to the treatment and
disposal of sewage within the state, with the exception of those functions assigned
by law to the Department of Environmental Quality including, but not limited to, the
licensing of sewage sludge transporters or haulers.
* * *
N. The office of health and nutrition shall be responsible for leading and
coordinating efforts within the Louisiana Department of Health that are
intended to promote health and nutrition, healthcare access, preventative
healthcare services, chronic disease prevention and management programs,
physical fitness, and health outcomes, including supplemental nutrition
assistance services and commodity programs for women, infants, and children.
§258.1. Office of health and nutrition
A. The department shall have an executive director for the office of
health and nutrition that reports directly to the secretary.
B. The office of health and nutrition shall be responsible for:
(1) Leading and coordinating the Governor's Council on Physical Fitness
and Sports, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for Women,
Infants, and Children (WIC), and the Commodity Supplemental Food Program
(CSFP).
(2) Developing and strengthening policy to increase access to and
consumption of healthy foods among recipients of the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP).
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 219 ENROLLED
(3) Leading and coordinating department initiatives that include
addressing health and nutrition, healthcare access, preventative healthcare
services, and chronic disease prevention and management programs.
(4) Coordinating with the office of aging and adult services and the office
of public health to provide public education on risk reduction strategies for
Alzheimer's and related dementias, including the diseases' links to other chronic
diseases.
Section 2. R.S. 46:450.3(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§450.3. WIC participants; homeless
A. The office of public health health and nutrition within the Louisiana
Department of Health shall adopt rules and regulations for the WIC program in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to provide nonperishable food
items to women and children. Such rules shall provide for the distribution of WIC
vouchers, in small quantities on a frequent basis, for food items that do not require
refrigeration or storage to eligible WIC participants that have been identified by
qualified organizations as being homeless. Such rules shall comply with
requirements of federal laws and regulations in order to ensure receipt of federal
funding for the program.
* * *
Section 3. The Louisiana Department of Health is authorized to transfer funding and
positions within the department to establish and implement the office of health and nutrition.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on October 1, 2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.